North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 7. Officers and Directors. [Repealed]

§§ 53-78 through 53-90.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-78; 1921, c. 4, s. 49; C.S., s. 221(a); 1951, c. 167, s. 1; 1989, c. 187, s. 13; 1995, c. 129, s. 16; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-79; 1921, c. 4, s. 50; C.S., s. 221(b); 1951, c. 167, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-80; 1921, c. 4, s. 51; C.S., s. 221(c); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1979, c. 483, s. 8; 1983, c. 214, s. 8; 1999-72, s. 1; 2001-263, s. 8; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-81; 1921, c. 4, s. 52; C.S., s. 221(d); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-82; 1921, c. 4, s. 53; C.S., s. 221(e); 1935, c. 464; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-83; 1921, c. 4, s. 54; C.S., s. 221(f); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-84; 1921, c. 4, s. 55; C.S., s. 221(g); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1967, c. 789, s. 14; 1991, c. 677, s. 8; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-85; 1921, c. 4, s. 56; C.S., s. 221(h); 1989, c. 187, s. 14; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-86; 1921, c. 4, s. 57; C.S., s. 221(i); 1947, c. 695; 1971, c. 272; 1993, c. 539, s. 419; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-87; 1921, c. 4, s. 58; C.S., s. 221(j); 1927, c. 47, s. 10; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1991, c. 677, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-87.1; 2009-28, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-88; 1921, c. 4, s. 59; C.S., s. 221(k); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-89; 1921, c. 4, s. 60; C.S., s. 221(l); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-90; 1921, c. 4, s. 61; Ex. Sess., 1921, c. 18; C.S., s. 221(m); 1927, c. 47, s. 11; 1929, c. 72, s. 2; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-91.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 129, s. 17.

§§ 53-91.1 through 53-91.3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-91.1; 1991, c. 677, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-91.2; 1995, c. 129, s. 18; 1999-72, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-91.3; 1995, c. 129, s. 18; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.